District of Columbia statutes.
7-1541.05

Repealed

Authorization by the Chief Medical Examiner.

Repealed.

Sept. 10, 1962, 76 Stat. 536, Pub. L. 87-656, § 9
May 26, 1970, 84 Stat. 270, Pub. L. 91-268, § 9(d)
July 29, 1970, 84 Stat. 579, Pub. L. 91-358, title I, § 160(b)
Mar. 5, 1981, D.C. Law 3-145, § 2, 27 DCR 4663
Sept. 29, 1992, D.C. Law 9-157, § 3, 39 DCR 5686
Oct. 19, 2000, D.C. Law 13-172,§ 2919(b), 47 DCR 6308
Apr. 15, 2008, D.C. Law 17-145, § 30(e)(3), 55 DCR 2532
1981 Ed., § 2-1605.
1973 Ed., § 2-258.
For temporary (90-day) amendment of section, see § 2919(b) of the Fiscal Year 2001 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2000 (D.C. Act 13-376, July 24, 2000, 47 DCR 6574).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 2919(b) of the Fiscal Year 2001 Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2000 (D.C. Act 13-438, October 20, 2000, 47 DCR 8740).
Mayor authorized to issue rules: Section 4 of D.C. Law 9-157 provided that the Mayor shall issue rules to implement the provisions of the act.
This section originated at a time when local government powers were delegated to a Board of Commissioners of the District of Columbia (see Acts Relating to the Establishment of the District of Columbia and its Various Forms of Governmental Organization in Volume 1). Section 401 of Reorganization Plan No. 3 of 1967 (see Reorganization Plans in Volume 1) transferred all of the functions of the Board of Commissioners under this section to a single Commissioner. The District of Columbia Self-Government and Governmental Reorganization Act, 87 Stat. 818, § 711 ( D.C. Code, § 1-207.11), abolished the District of Columbia Council and the Office of Commissioner of the District of Columbia. These branches of government were replaced by the Council of the District of Columbia and the Office of Mayor of the District of Columbia, respectively. Accordingly, and also pursuant to § 714(a) of such Act ( D.C. Code, § 1-207.14(a)), appropriate changes in terminology were made in this section.